Utah statutes.
31A-5-420.   Payment of dividends by mutual insurers.
(1)  When it is in the best interests of the company, the directors of a
domestic mutual insurer shall declare, apportion, and pay to its members
dividends from its net savings and earnings.
(2)  The insurer shall make a reasonable classification of its participating
policies and its assumed risks.  No dividend shall be paid that is
inequitable, unfairly discriminates between classifications of insurance
contracts, or unfairly discriminates between policies within the same
classification.
(3)  Unless stated in the policy, no dividend, otherwise earned, shall be
contingent upon the payment of the renewal premium on any policy.
(4)  Subsection (1) may not be construed to require an insurer determined by
the United States Internal Revenue Service to be a nonprofit organization to
pay a dividend in a manner which would jeopardize that status.
